Missouri, session 2026, SB1270.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 167, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 167.961, to read as
follows:
167.961. 1. As used in this section, "feminine
hygiene product" means tampons, sanitary napkins, menstrual
sponges, menstrual cups, and similar menstrual hygiene
products.
2. All public schools and public charter schools that
include any of grades four through twelve shall make at
least one type of age-appropriate feminine hygiene product
available in each school building for use by female students
at no cost.
3. Each local board of education or public charter
school governing body shall adopt policies:
(1) Establishing procedures for the distribution of
age-appropriate feminine hygiene products for use by female
students and related guidance regarding the safe and healthy
use of the products; and

SB 1270 2
(2) Prohibiting the resale, redistribution, or misuse
of feminine hygiene products distributed to female students
in accordance with this section.
✓